apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="bouet/a__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aet</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omp</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ont</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emp</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ec’h</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jout</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jomp</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>joc’h</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jont</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jod</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ay</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aio</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imp</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oc’h</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fen</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fes</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fe</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>femp</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fec’h</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fent</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fed</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jen</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jes</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jemp</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jec’h</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jent</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jed</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omp</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>	
	

    <e lm="bezhina"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ezhin</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="boueta"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ouet</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bleuniaoua"><par n="initial-b"/><i>leuniaou</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="briata"><par n="initial-b"/><i>riat</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chevreta"><i>chevret</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="c’hwesha"><i>c’hwesh</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="demata"><par n="initial-d"/><i>emat</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dluzheta"><par n="initial-d"/><i>luzhet</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="doura"><par n="initial-d"/><i>our</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="flamboesa"><i>flamboes</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="goulennata"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oulennat</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gwrac’heta"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>rac’het</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kafeta"><par n="initial-k"/><i>afet</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kistina"><par n="initial-k"/><i>istin</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="logota"><i>logot</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="marc’hata"><par n="initial-m"/><i>arc’hat</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="merc’heta"><par n="initial-m"/><i>erc’het</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="meskla"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eskl</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="morueta"><par n="initial-m"/><i>oruet</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mouara"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ouar</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="oberata"><i>oberat</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pesketa"><par n="initial-p"/><i>esket</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pesketa"><par n="initial-p"/><p><l>esketa</l><r>esket</r></p><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sardineta"><i>sardinet</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="siliaoua"><i>siliaou</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skoliata"><i>skoliat</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tañva"><par n="initial-t"/><i>añv</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tuta"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ut</i><par n="bouet/a__vblex"/></e>
